Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 6. Yellowstone River Compact

§ 41-12-601.
Generally.

Ratification and approval is hereby given to the Yellowstone River Compact as signed at the city of Billings, in the state of Montana, on the 8th day of December, A. D. 1950, by L. C. Bishop, the state engineer of the state of Wyoming, and all of the above named assistant commissioners, under and in accordance with the authority of section 71-2601, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1945, which compact was also signed by the duly authorized commissioners of the states of Montana and North Dakota, and approved by the representative of the United States, which Yellowstone River Compact is in full as follows:

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 10, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-511.

YELLOWSTONE RIVER COMPACT

The state of Montana, the state of North Dakota, and the state of Wyoming, being moved by consideration of interstate comity, and desiring to remove all causes of present and future controversy between said states and between persons in one (1) and persons in another with respect to the waters of the Yellowstone River and its tributaries, other than waters within or waters which contribute to the flow of streams within the Yellowstone National Park, and desiring to provide for an equitable division and apportionment of such waters, and to encourage the beneficial development and use thereof, acknowledging that in future projects or programs for the regulation, control, and use of water in the Yellowstone River basin the great importance of water for irrigation in the signatory states shall be recognized, have resolved to conclude a compact as authorized under the act of congress of the United States of America, approved June 2, 1949 (Public Law 83, 81st congress, first session), for the attainment of these purposes, and to that end, through their respective governments, have named as their respective commissioners:

For the state of Montana: Fred E. Buck A. W. Bradshaw H. W. Bunston John Herzog John M. Jarussi Ashton Jones Chris Josephson A. Wallace Kingsbury P. F. Leonard Walter M. McLaughlin Dave M. Manning Joseph Muggli Chester E. Onstad Ed F. Parriott R. R. Renne Keith W. Trout For the state of North Dakota: I. A. Acker Einar H. Dahl J. J. Walsh For the state of Wyoming: L. C. Bishop Earl T. Bower J. Harold Cash Ben F. Cochrane Ernest J. Goppert Richard L. Greene E. C. Gwillim E. J. Johnson Lee E. Keith N. V. Kurtz Harry L. Littlefield R. E. McNally Will G. Metz Mark N. Partridge Alonzo R. Shreve Charles M. Smith Leonard F. Thornton M. B. Walker

Click to view

who, after negotiations participated in by R. J. Newell, appointed as the representative of the United States of America, have agreed upon the following articles, to-wit:

Article I

Where the name of a state is used in this compact, as a party thereto, it shall be construed to include the individuals, corporations, partnerships, associations, districts, administrative departments, bureaus, political subdivisions, agencies, persons, permittees, appropriators, and all others using, claiming, or in any manner asserting any right to the use of the waters of the Yellowstone River system under the authority of said state.

Any individual, corporation, partnership, association, district, administrative department, bureau, political subdivision, agency, person, permittee, or appropriator authorized by or under the laws of a signatory state, and all others using, claiming, or in any manner asserting any right to the use of the waters of the Yellowstone River system under the authority of said state, shall be subject to the terms of this compact. Where the singular is used in this article, it shall be construed to include the plural.

Article II

The state of Montana, the state of North Dakota, and the state of Wyoming are hereinafter designated as “Montana”, “North Dakota”, and “Wyoming”, respectively.

The terms “commission” and “Yellowstone River compact commission” mean the agency created as provided herein for the administration of this compact.

The term “Yellowstone River basin” means areas in Wyoming, Montana, and North Dakota drained by the Yellowstone River and its tributaries, and includes the area in Montana known as Lake Basin, but excludes those lands lying within Yellowstone National Park.

The term “Yellowstone River system” means the Yellowstone River and all of its tributaries, including springs and swamps, from their sources to the mouth of the Yellowstone River near Buford, North Dakota, except those portions thereof which are within or contribute to the flow of streams within the Yellowstone National Park.

The term “tributary” means any stream which in a natural state contributes to the flow of the Yellowstone River, including interstate tributaries and tributaries thereof, but excluding those which are within or contribute to the flow of streams within the Yellowstone National Park.

The term “interstate tributaries” means the Clarks Fork, Yellowstone River; the Bighorn River (except Little Bighorn River); the Tongue River; and the Powder River, whose confluences with the Yellowstone River are respectively at or near the city (or town) of Laurel, Big Horn, Miles City, and Terry, all in the state of Montana.

The terms “divert” and “diversion” mean the taking or removing of water from the Yellowstone River or any tributary thereof when the water so taken or removed is not returned directly into the channel of the Yellowstone River or of the tributary from which it is taken.

The term “beneficial use” is herein defined to be that use by which the water supply of a drainage basin is depleted when usefully employed by the activities of man.

The term “domestic use” shall mean the use of water by an individual, or by a family unit or household for drinking, cooking, laundering, sanitation and other personal comforts and necessities; and for the irrigation of a family garden or orchard not exceeding one-half acre in area.

The term “stock water use” shall mean the use of water for livestock and poultry.

Article III

It is considered that no commission or administrative body is necessary to administer this compact or divide the waters of the Yellowstone River basin as between the states of Montana and North Dakota. The provisions of this compact, as between the states of Wyoming and Montana, shall be administered by a commission composed of one (1) representative from the state of Wyoming and one (1) representative from the state of Montana, to be selected by the governors of said states as such states may choose, and one (1) representative selected by the director of the United States geological survey or whatever federal agency may succeed to the functions and duties of that agency, to be appointed by him at the request of the states to sit with the commission and who shall, when present, act as chairman of the commission without vote, except as herein provided.

The salaries and necessary expenses of each state representative shall be paid by the respective state; all other expenses incident to the administration of this compact not borne by the United States shall be allocated to and borne one-half by the state of Wyoming and one-half by the state of Montana.

In addition to other powers and duties herein conferred upon the commission and the members thereof, the jurisdiction of the commission shall include the collection, correlation, and presentation of factual data, the maintenance of records having a bearing upon the administration of this compact, and recommendations to such states upon matters connected with the administration of this compact, and the commission may employ such services and make such expenditures as reasonable and necessary within the limit of funds provided for that purpose by the respective states, and shall compile a report for each year ending September 30 and transmit it to the governors of the signatory states on or before December 31 of each year.

The secretary of the army; the secretary of the interior; the secretary of agriculture; the chairman, federal power commission; the secretary of commerce, or comparable officers of whatever federal agencies may succeed to the functions and duties of these agencies, and such other federal officers and officers of appropriate agencies of the signatory states having services or data useful or necessary to the compact commission, shall cooperate, ex officio, with the commission in the execution of its duty in the collection, correlation, and publication of records and data necessary for the proper administration of the compact; and these officers may perform such other services related to the compact as may be mutually agreed upon with the commission.

The commission shall have power to formulate rules and regulations and to perform any act which they may find necessary to carry out the provisions of this compact, and to amend such rules and regulations. All such rules and regulations shall be filed in the office of the state engineer of each of the signatory states for public inspection.

In case of the failure of the representatives of Wyoming and Montana to unanimously agree on any matter necessary to the proper administration of this compact, then the member selected by the director of the United States geological survey shall have the right to vote upon the matters in disagreement and such points of disagreement shall then be decided by a majority vote of the representatives of the states of Wyoming and Montana and said member selected by the director of the United States geological survey, each being entitled to one (1) vote.

The commission herein authorized shall have power to sue and be sued in its official capacity in any federal court of the signatory states, and may adopt and use an official seal which shall be judicially noticed.

Article IV

The commission shall itself, or in conjunction with other responsible agencies, cause to be established, maintained, and operated such suitable water gaging and evaporation stations as it finds necessary in connection with its duties.

Article V

Appropriative rights to the beneficial uses of the water of the Yellowstone River system existing in each signatory state as of January 1, 1950, shall continue to be enjoyed in accordance with the laws governing the acquisition and use of water under the doctrine of appropriation.

Of the unused and unappropriated waters of the interstate tributaries of the Yellowstone River as of January 1, 1950, there is allocated to each signatory state such quantity of that water as shall be necessary to provide supplemental water supplies for the rights described in paragraph (a) of this article V, such supplemental rights to be acquired and enjoyed in accordance with the laws governing the acquisition and use of water under the doctrine of appropriation, and the remainder of the unused and unappropriated water is allocated to each state for storage or direct diversions for beneficial use on new lands or for other purposes as follows:

Clarks Fork, Yellowstone River

To Wyoming . . . . . sixty percent (60%)

To Montana . . . . . forty percent (40%)

The point of measurement shall be below the last diversion from Clarks Fork above Rock Creek.

Bighorn River (Exclusive of Little Bighorn River)

To Wyoming . . . . . eighty percent (80%)

To Montana . . . . . twenty percent (20%)

The point of measurement shall be below the last diversion from the Bighorn River above its junction with the Yellowstone River, and the inflow of the Little Bighorn River shall be excluded from the quantity of water subject to allocation.

Tongue River

To Wyoming . . . . . forty percent (40%)

To Montana . . . . . sixty percent (60%)

The point of measurement shall be below the last diversion from the Tongue River above its junction with the Yellowstone River.

Powder River (Including the Little Powder River)

To Wyoming . . . . . forty-two percent (42%)

To Montana . . . . . fifty-eight percent (58%)

The point of measurement shall be below the last diversion from the Powder River above its junction with the Yellowstone River.

The quantity of water subject to the percentage allocations, in paragraph (b) (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this article V, shall be determined on an annual water year basis measured from October 1st of any year through September 30th of the succeeding year. The quantity to which the percentage factors shall be applied through a given date in any water year shall be, in acre-feet, equal to the algebraic sum of:

The total diversions, in acre-feet, above the point of measurement, for irrigation, municipal, and industrial uses in Wyoming and Montana developed after January 1, 1950, during the period from October 1st to that given date;

The net change in storage, in acre-feet, in all reservoirs in Wyoming and Montana above the point of measurement completed subsequent to January 1, 1950, during the period from October 1st to that given date;

The net change in storage, in acre-feet, in existing reservoirs in Wyoming and Montana above the point of measurement, which is used for irrigation, municipal, and industrial purposes developed after January 1, 1950, during the period October 1st to that given date;

The quantity of water, in acre-feet, that passed the point of measurement in the stream during the period from October 1st to that given date.

All existing rights to the beneficial use of waters of the Yellowstone River in the states of Montana and North Dakota, below Intake, Montana, valid under the laws of these states as of January 1, 1950, are hereby recognized and shall be and remain unimpaired by this compact. During the period May 1 to September 30, inclusive, of each year, lands within Montana and North Dakota shall be entitled to the beneficial use of the flow of waters of the Yellowstone River below Intake, Montana, on a proportionate basis of acreage irrigated. Waters of tributary streams, having their origin in either Montana or North Dakota, situated entirely in said respective states and flowing into the Yellowstone River below Intake, Montana, are allotted to the respective states in which situated.

There are hereby excluded from the provisions of this compact:

Existing and future domestic and stock water uses of water: Provided, that the capacity of any reservoir for stock water so excluded shall not exceed twenty (20) acre-feet;

Devices and facilities for the control and regulation of surface waters.

From time to time the commission shall reexamine the allocations herein made and upon unanimous agreement may recommend modifications therein as are fair, just, and equitable, giving consideration among other factors to:

Priorities of water rights;

Acreage irrigated;

Acreage irrigable under existing works; and

Potentially irrigable lands.

Article VI

Nothing contained in this compact shall be so construed or interpreted as to affect adversely any rights to the use of the waters of Yellowstone River and its tributaries owned by or for Indians, Indian tribes, and their reservations.

Article VII

A lower signatory state shall have the right, by compliance with the laws of an upper signatory state, except as to legislative consent, to file application for and receive permits to appropriate and use any waters in the Yellowstone River system not specifically apportioned to or appropriated by such upper state as provided in article V; and to construct or participate in the construction and use of any dam, storage reservoir, or diversion works in such upper state for the purpose of conserving and regulating water that may be apportioned to or appropriated by the lower state: provided, that such right is subject to the rights of the upper state to control, regulate, and use the water apportioned to and appropriated by it: and provided further, that should an upper state elect, it may share in the use of any such facilities constructed by a lower state to the extent of its reasonable needs upon assuming or guaranteeing payment of its proportionate share of the cost of the construction, operation, and maintenance. This provision shall apply with equal force and effect to an upper state in the circumstance of the necessity of the acquisition of rights by an upper state in a lower state.

Each claim hereafter initiated for an appropriation of water in one signatory state for use in another signatory state shall be filed in the office of the state engineer of the signatory state in which the water is to be diverted, and a duplicate copy of the application or notice shall be filed in the office of the state engineer of the signatory state in which the water is to be used.

Appropriations may hereafter be adjudicated in the state in which the water is diverted, and where a portion or all of the lands irrigated are in another signatory state, such adjudications shall be confirmed in that state by the proper authority. Each adjudication is to conform with the laws of the state where the water is diverted and shall be recorded in the county and state where the water is used.

The use of water allocated under article V of this compact for projects constructed after the date of this compact by the United States of America or any of its agencies or instrumentalities, shall be charged as a use by the state in which the use is made: provided, that such use incident to the diversion, impounding, or conveyance of water in one (1) state for use in another shall be charged to such latter state.

Article VIII

A lower signatory state shall have the right to acquire in an upper state by purchase, or through exercise of the power of eminent domain, such lands, easements, and rights-of-way for the construction, operation, and maintenance of pumping plants, storage reservoirs, canals, conduits, and appurtenant works as may be required for the enjoyment of the privileges granted herein to such lower state. This provision shall apply with equal force and effect to an upper state in the circumstance of the necessity of the acquisition of rights by an upper state in a lower state.

Article IX

Should any facilities be constructed by a lower signatory state in an upper signatory state under the provisions of article VII, the construction, operation, repairs, and replacements of such facilities shall be subject to the laws of the upper state. This provision shall apply with equal force and effect to an upper state in the circumstance of the necessity of the acquisition of rights by an upper state in a lower state.

Article X

No water shall be diverted from the Yellowstone River basin without the unanimous consent of all the signatory states. In the event water from another river basin shall be imported into the Yellowstone River basin or transferred from one (1) tributary basin to another by the United States of America, Montana, North Dakota, or Wyoming, or any of them jointly, the state having the right to the use of such water shall be given proper credit therefor in determining its share of the water apportioned in accordance with article V herein.

Article XI

The provisions of this compact shall remain in full force and effect until amended in the same manner as it is required to be ratified to become operative as provided in article XV.

Article XII

This compact may be terminated at any time by unanimous consent of the signatory states, and upon such termination all rights then established hereunder shall continue unimpaired.

Article XIII

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit or prevent any state from instituting or maintaining any action or proceeding, legal or equitable, in any federal court or the United States supreme court, for the protection of any right under this compact or the enforcement of any of its provisions.

Article XIV

The physical and other conditions characteristic of the Yellowstone River and peculiar to the territory drained and served thereby and to the development thereof, have actuated the signatory states in the consummation of this compact, and none of them, nor the United States of America by its consent and approval, concedes thereby the establishment of any general principle or precedent with respect to other interstate streams.

Article XV

This compact shall become operative when approved by the legislature of each of the signatory states and consented to and approved by the congress of the United States.

Article XVI

Nothing in this compact shall be deemed:

To impair or affect the sovereignty or jurisdiction of the United States of America in or over the area of waters affected by such compact, any rights or powers of the United States of America, its agencies, or instrumentalities, in and to the use of the waters of the Yellowstone River Basin nor its capacity to acquire rights in and to the use of said waters;

To subject any property of the United States of America, its agencies, or instrumentalities to taxation by any state or subdivision thereof, nor to create an obligation on the part of the United States of America, its agencies, or instrumentalities, by reason of the acquisition, construction, or operation of any property or works of whatsoever kind, to make any payments to any state or political subdivision thereof, state agency, municipality, or entity whatsoever in reimbursement for the loss of taxes;

To subject any property of the United States of America, its agencies, or instrumentalities, to the laws of any state to an extent other than the extent to which these laws would apply without regard to the compact.

Article XVII

Should a court of competent jurisdiction hold any part of this compact to be contrary to the constitution of any signatory state or of the United States of America, all other severable provisions of this compact shall continue in full force and effect.

Article XVIII

No sentence, phrase, or clause in this compact or in any provision thereof, shall be construed or interpreted to divest any signatory state or any of the agencies or officers of such states of the jurisdiction of the water of each state as apportioned in this compact.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF the commissioners have signed this compact in quadruplicate original, one (1) of which shall be filed in the archives of the department of state of the United States of America and shall be deemed the authoritative original, and of which a duly certified copy shall be forwarded to the governor of each signatory state.

Done at the city of Billings in the state of Montana, this 8th day of December, in the year of our Lord, one thousand nine hundred and fifty.

Commissioners for the state of Montana: Fred E. Buck /s/ Fred E. Buck A. W. Bradshaw /s/ A. W. Bradshaw H. W. Bunston /s/ H. W. Bunston John Herzog /s/ John Herzog John M. Jarussi /s/ John M. Jarussi Ashton Jones /s/ Ashton Jones Chris Josephson /s/ Chris Josephson A. Wallace Kingsbury /s/ A. Wallace Kingsbury P. F. Leonard /s/ P. F. Leonard Walter M. McLaughlin /s/ Walter M. McLaughlin Dave M. Manning /s/ Dave M. Manning Joseph Muggli /s/ Joseph Muggli Chester E. Onstad /s/ Chester E. Onstad Ed F. Parriott /s/ Ed F. Parriott R. R. Renne /s/ R. R. Renne Keith W. Trout /s/ Keith W. Trout Commissioners for the State of North Dakota: I. A. Acker /s/ I. A. Acker Einar H. Dahl /s/ Einar H. Dahl J. J. Walsh /s/ J. J. Walsh Commissioners for the State of Wyoming: L. C. Bishop /s/ L. C. Bishop Earl T. Bower /s/ Earl T. Bower J. Harold Cash /s/ J. Harold Cash Ben F. Cochrane /s/ Ben F. Cochrane Ernest J. Goppert /s/ Ernest J. Goppert Richard L. Greene /s/ Richard L. Greene E. C. Gwillim /s/ E. C. Gwillim E. J. Johnson /s/ E. J. Johnson Lee E. Keith /s/ Lee E. Keith N. V. Kurtz /s/ N. V. Kurtz Harry L. Littlefield /s/ Harry L. Littlefield R. E. McNally /s/ R. E. McNally Will G. Metz /s/ Will G. Metz Mark N. Partridge /s/ Mark N. Partridge Alonzo R. Shreve /s/ Alonzo R. Shreve Charles M. Smith /s/ Charles M. Smith Leonard F. Thornton /s/ Leonard F. Thornton M. B. Walker /s/ M. B. Walker

Click to view

I have participated in the negotiation of this compact and intend to report favorably thereon to the congress of the United States.

/s/ R.J. Newell R.J. Newell Representative of the United States of America.

Click to view

Editor's notes. —

Section 71-2601, W.C.S. 1945, referred to in the first paragraph of this section and in the preamble below, was repealed in 1957.

There is no subsection (i) in article II or (b) in article XVI in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Preamble. —

“Whereas, under the provisions of section 71-2601, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1945, the legislature of the State of Wyoming provided for the appointment of an interstate streams commissioner and assistant commissioners to negotiate agreements relative to interstate streams; and

“Whereas, under the authority of said act, the state engineer, L. C. Bishop, acted as commissioner, and Earl T. Bower, J. Harold Cash, Ben F. Cochrane, Ernest J. Goppert, Richard L. Greene, E. C. Gwillim, E. J. Johnson, Lee E. Keith, N. V. Kurtz, Harry L. Littlefield, R. E. McNally, Will G. Metz, Mark N. Partridge, Alonzo R. Shreve, Charles M. Smith, Leonard F. Thornton, and M. B. Walker acted as assistant commissioners, who, together with the duly appointed commissioners of the states of Montana and North Dakota, and the representative of the United States of America, negotiated a compact or agreement now called the ‘Yellowstone River Compact’ and which was signed on the 8th day of December, A.D. 1950, at the city of Billings, in the state of Montana; and

“Whereas, the said section 71-2601, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1945, further contained the following provision: ‘That any such compact or compacts, agreement or agreements so entered into by such states and the United States shall not be binding or obligatory upon any of the contracting parties thereto unless or until the same shall have been ratified and approved by the legislature of each of such states and the congress of the United States.’”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Aldo Leopold and Western Water Law: Thinking Perpendicular to the Prior Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1989).

§ 41-12-602.
When binding; notice of ratification.

Said compact shall not be binding or obligatory upon any of the high contracting parties thereto unless and until the same shall have been ratified by the legislature of each of the said states and approved by the congress of the United States. The governor of Wyoming shall give notice of the ratification and approval of said compact by the Wyoming legislature to the governors of the states of Montana and North Dakota and to the president of the United States.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 10, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-512.

§ 41-12-603.
Diversions from the Yellowstone River Basin; definitions.

Unless the context requires otherwise, in W.S.

41-12-603

through

41-12-607

the following definitions apply:

“Basin” means the Yellowstone River Basin as defined in the Yellowstone River Compact, W.S.

41-12-601

;

“Compact” means the Yellowstone River Compact provided for in W.S.

41-12-601

;

“Compact water” means any water in the basin that is allocated to Wyoming, Montana or North Dakota by the terms of the compact or whose appropriation is in any manner regulated by the terms of the compact.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 174, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-12-604.
Diversions from the Yellowstone River Basin; authority to approve.

The state engineer may consent on behalf of the state of Wyoming to diversions of water from the basin pursuant to Article X of the compact, including diversions of water allocated under the terms of the compact to the other signatory states of Montana and North Dakota.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 174, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state engineer, see
art. 8, §
5, Wyo. Const., and
§

9-2-2011

.

§ 41-12-605.
Diversions from the Yellowstone River Basin; application; notice.

Any person proposing to divert compact water allocated to Wyoming from the basin for use in Wyoming, whether the point of diversion is in Wyoming, Montana or North Dakota, shall file an application with the state engineer. The application must state the name and address of the applicant, describe the proposed point of diversion, the point of use, the ultimate use and facts tending to show that:

The diversion and ultimate use of the water is for a beneficial use of water;

The diversion and ultimate use of water will not adversely affect the water rights of other persons;

The proposed means of diversion, construction and operation are adequate;

The diversion and ultimate use will not interfere with other planned uses or developments for which a water right with a senior priority date has been applied for or permit issued;

The diversion and ultimate use of the water will not exceed the allocated share under the compact of any of the signatory states;

The diversion and ultimate use of the water are in the public interest of Wyoming; and

The applicant intends to comply with the laws of the signatory states to the compact.

Any person proposing to divert compact water allocated to Montana or North Dakota for use out of the basin, whether the point of diversion is in Wyoming, Montana or North Dakota, shall file an application with the state engineer. The application must state the name and address of the applicant, describe the proposed point of diversion, the point of use, the ultimate use and facts tending to show that:

The proposed means of diversion, construction and operation are adequate;

The diversion and ultimate use of the water will not exceed the allocated share under the compact of any of the signatory states; and

The applicant intends to comply with the compact.

The state engineer shall publish a reasonable summary of the application for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least three (3) newspapers of general circulation within the state and if the proposed point of diversion is within Wyoming, publish the notice in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in the county where the diversion point is to be located.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 174, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state engineer, see
art. 8, §
5, Wyo. Const., and
§

9-2-2011

.

§ 41-12-606.
Diversions from the Yellowstone River Basin; objections; public hearing.

An objection to an application must be filed with the state engineer by the date specified in the published notice.

The objector to an application shall state his name and address and any facts tending to show how the objector will be affected by the application.

If the state engineer receives a valid objection to an application, the state engineer shall hold a public hearing within sixty (60) days from the date set by the state engineer for filing objections. Service of the notice of the hearing must be made by certified mail upon the applicant and the objector.

Cost of the public hearing shall be borne by the applicant only in those cases of an application made pursuant to W.S. 41-12-605(a).

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 174, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state engineer, see
art. 8, §
5, Wyo. Const., and
§

9-2-2011

.

§ 41-12-607.
Diversions from the Yellowstone River Basin; criteria for approval; terms.

The state engineer may conduct whatever other studies he deems necessary to adequately evaluate an application.

The state engineer may issue his approval of an application proposing to divert compact water allocated to Wyoming if:

The diversion and the ultimate use of the water are for a beneficial use of water;

The diversion and ultimate use of water will not adversely affect the water rights of other persons;

The proposed means of diversion, construction and operation are adequate;

The diversion and ultimate use will not interfere unreasonably with other planned uses or developments for which a water right application has been filed or a permit issued;

The diversion and ultimate use of the water will not exceed the allocated share under the compact of any of the signatory states;

The diversion and ultimate use of the water are in the public interest of Wyoming; and

The applicant signs an agreement to comply with the laws of the signatory states to the compact in construction, operation and maintaining all facilities associated with the diversion and ultimate use of the water.

The state engineer may approve an application proposing to divert compact water allocated to Montana or North Dakota as described in W.S. 41-12-605(b) if the diversion will not adversely affect the property rights or interests of an appropriator located in Wyoming and if the diversion and ultimate use of water will not exceed the allocated share under the compact of any of the signatory states.

The state engineer may approve an application subject to such terms, conditions, restrictions and limitations as the state engineer considers necessary to meet the application criteria listed in W.S.

41-12-605

and this section.

The state engineer’s approval of an application pursuant to this act shall not constitute approval for an out of state use of the water pursuant to W.S.

41-3-115

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 174, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state engineer, see
art. 8, §
5, Wyo. Const., and
§

9-2-2011

.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

41-3-115

” for “W.S.

41-3-105

and

41-3-115

” in (e).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.